Utah statutes.
13-7-2.   Definitions.

(1) (a)  "Place of public accommodation" includes every place, establishment, or facility of whatever kind, nature, or class that caters or offers its services, facilities, or goods to the general public for a fee or charge, except, an establishment that is:

(i)  located within a building that contains not more than five rooms for rent or hire; and 

(ii)  actually occupied by the proprietor of the establishment as the proprietor's residence.

(b)  A place, establishment, or facility that caters or offers its services, facilities, or goods to the general public gratuitously shall be within the definition of this term if it receives any substantial governmental subsidy or support.

(c)  "Place of public accommodation" does not apply to any institution, church, any apartment house, club, or place of accommodation which is in its nature distinctly private except to the extent that it is open to the public.

(2) "Person" includes one or more individuals, partnerships, associations, organizations, corporations, labor unions, legal representatives, trustees, trustees in bankruptcy, receivers, and other organized groups of persons.

(3)  "Enterprises regulated by the state" means:

(a) an institution subject to regulation under Title 70C, Utah Consumer Credit Code;

(b)  a place of business that sells an alcoholic product at retail as provided in Title 32B, Alcoholic Beverage Control Act;

(c) an insurer regulated by Title 31A, Insurance Code; and

(d) a public utility subject to regulation under Title 54, Public Utilities Act.



Amended by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 378, 2010 General Session

